Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.15.110

Involuntary dissolution.

A noncharter code city may be involuntarily dissolved in the manner provided in RCW 35.07.230, 35.07.240, 35.07.250, and 35.07.260 upon the existence of the conditions stated in RCW 35.07.230.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.15.110.]